src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb morphology

- LEXICON V1-SL =  1st. Conjugation - slender

- +PastInd+1P+Sg:^Verbis NegQPast; = variation shílis as well as shíleas

- LEXICON V1-BR = 1st. Conjugation - broad

- LEXICON V1b-PresInd = Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
- +Auto:tar NegQ; = +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar

- LEXICON V1b-PastInd = Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
- +1P+Sg:as NegQPast; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V1b-FutInd = Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
- +1P+Sg:fad NegQ; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V1b-PastImp = Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)

- LEXICON V1b-Cond = Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

- +CM:fadh #; = munster variation

- LEXICON V1b-PresSubj = Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.

- LEXICON V1b-Imper = Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

- LEXICON V1-BR-LV = 1st. Conjugation - ! Broad F Slender T 

- LEXICON V1xa-PresInd = Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
- +Auto:itear NegQ; = +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar

- LEXICON V1xa-PastInd = Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

- +1P+Sg:s NegQPast; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V1xa-FutInd = Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach

- LEXICON V1xa-PastImp = Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)

- LEXICON V1xa-Cond = Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

- LEXICON V1xa-PresSubj = Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.

- LEXICON V1xa-Imper = Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

- LEXICON V1-SL-LV = 1st. Conjugation - ! Slender F Slender T 

- LEXICON V1xb-PresInd = Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach

- LEXICON V1xb-PastInd = Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

- LEXICON V1xb-FutInd = Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
- +1P+Sg:ifad NegQ; = ?????  14 Feb

- LEXICON V1xb-PastImp = Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)

- LEXICON V1xb-Cond = Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

- LEXICON V1xb-PresSubj = Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.

- LEXICON V1xb-Imper = Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

- LEXICON V1-SV = 1st. Conjugation - ! Slender F Slender T 

- LEXICON V1xc-PresInd = Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach

- LEXICON V1xc-PastInd = Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
- +1P+Sg:^igh^Verbíos NegQPast; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V1xc-FutInd = Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
- +1P+Sg:íos NegQ; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V1xc-PastImp = Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)

- LEXICON V1xc-Cond = Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach
- +CM:ífeadh #; = munster variation

- LEXICON V1xc-PresSubj = Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.

- LEXICON V1xc-Imper = Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

- LEXICON V1-SL-X = 1st. Conjugation - slender becomes broad

- LEXICON V1-SL-BR-sync = 1st. Conjugation - slender is sync. and becomes broad

- LEXICON V1-SL-BR = 1st. Conjugation - slender becomes broad

- LEXICON V1xd-Imper = Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

- LEXICON V1xd-PastInd = Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
- +1P+Sg:^Verbeas NegQPast; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V1-SL-LC = 1st. Conjugation - slender becomes broad except where

- LEXICON V2-BR = 2nd. Conjugation - broad

- LEXICON V2-SL = 2nd. Conjugation - slender

- LEXICON V2-BR-sync = 2nd. Conjugation - broad - syncopated

- LEXICON V2-SL-sync = 2nd. Conjugation - slender - syncopated

- LEXICON V2-BR-0 = 2nd. Conjugation - broad

- LEXICON V2-BR-PresInd = Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
- +Auto:aítear NegQ; = +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar

- LEXICON V2-BR-PastInd = Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

- +1P+Sg:aíos NegQPast; = 14 Feb

- LEXICON V2-BR-FutInd = Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
- +1P+Sg:aíos NegQ; = 14 Feb
- +Rel:ós^Sé #; = a chosnós

- LEXICON V2-BR-PastImp = Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)

- LEXICON V2-BR-Cond = Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

- LEXICON V2-BR-PresSubj = Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.

- LEXICON V2-BR-Imper = Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

inserted +Len +Uru to distinguish between a bhíonn & a mbíonn Dir/Indir
Rel clauses Dec 2004

- LEXICON NegQ 

- LEXICON NegQPast 

- LEXICON NegQSaor 

- LEXICON NegQLen 

- LEXICON NegImper 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
